Massachusetts, session 194th, H709.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 7A of chapter 71 is hereby amended by adding at the end of the fourth paragraph,
the following new sentence:-
Provided, said school committee shall consider as an alternative the purchase of monthly
transit passes in accordance with section 5 of chapter 161A prior to advertising for or inviting
bids for a contract.
of 1